Louisiana, session 2026, HB442.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 13:1401.1 and 1403 hereby amended and reenacted to read as
follows:
§1401.1. Election districts
The family court for the parish of East Baton Rouge shall consist of three
election sections. Election section one shall consist of Precincts 1-1, 1-3, 1-4, 1-5,
1-6, 1-7, 1-8, 1-10, 1-11, 1-13, 1-14, 1-15, 1-16, 1-17, 1-18, 1-19, 1-20, 1-21, 1-22,
1-23, 1-24, 1-25, 1-26, 1-27, 1-28, 1-29, 1-30, 1-31, 1-32, 1-37, 1-38, 1-45, 1-50, 1-
51, 1-58, 1-61, 1-62, 1-63, 1-67, 1-68, 1-77, 1-84, 1-85, 1-86, 1-91, 1-92, 1-93, 1-94,
1-95, 1-100, 1-101, 2-1, 2-2, 2-3, 2-4, 2-9, 2-13, 2-15, 2-16, 2-17, 2-20, 2-22, 2-23,
2-24, and 2-25. Election section two shall consist of Precincts 1-55, 1-60, 1-71, 1-
81, 1-87, 1-88, 1-89, 1-90, 1-97, 1-98, 2-5, 2-6, 2-7, 2-8, 2-10, 2-11, 2-12, 2-14, 2-
18, 2-21, 2-26, 3-1, 3-2, 3-3, 3-4, 3-6, 3-7, 3-8, 3-9, 3-10, 3-12, 3-14, 3-15, 3-16, 3-
18, 3-19, 3-21, 3-22, 3-24, 3-25, 3-26, 3-28, 3-30, 3-32, 3-33, 3-34, and 3-38.
Page 1 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-224 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 442
Election section three shall consist of Precincts 1-2, 1-9, 1-12, 1-33, 1-34, 1-35, 1-36,
1-39, 1-40, 1-41, 1-42, 1-43, 1-44, 1-46, 1-47, 1-48, 1-49, 1-52, 1-53, 1-54, 1-56, 1-
57, 1-59, 1-64, 1-65, 1-66, 1-69, 1-70, 1-72, 1-73, 1-74, 1-75, 1-76, 1-78, 1-79, 1-80,
1-82, 1-83, 1-96, 1-99, 1-102, 1-103, 3-5, 3-11, 3-13, 3-17, 3-20, 3-23, 3-27, 3-29,
3-31, 3-35, 3-36, and 3-37.
(1) Election section one is composed of Precincts 1-11, 1-20, 1-54, 1-55,
1-60, 1-70, 1-71, 1-77, 1-78, 1-81, 1-82, 1-83, 1-84, 1-87, 1-88, 1-93, 1-95, 1-96,
1-97, 1-101, 2-1, 2-2, 2-3, 2-4, 2-5, 2-9, 2-10, 2-11, 2-12, 2-13, 2-14, 2-15, 2-16,
2-17, 2-18, 2-19, 2-20, 2-21, 2-23, 2-24, 2-25, 2-26, 2-27, 2-28, 2-29, 2-30, 2-31,
2-32, 2-34, 2-35, 2-36, 2-37, 2-38, 3-8, 3-24, 3-42, and 3-54 of East Baton Rouge
Parish.
(2) Election section two is composed of Precincts 1-1, 1-2, 1-3, 1-4, 1-5, 1-6,
1-7, 1-10, 1-13, 1-14, 1-15, 1-16, 1-18, 1-19, 1-21, 1-22, 1-23, 1-24, 1-25, 1-26, 1-27,
1-28, 1-29, 1-30, 1-31, 1-32, 1-36, 1-37, 1-38, 1-45, 1-46, 1-50, 1-51, 1-58, 1-61,
1-62, 1-63, 1-67, 1-76, 1-85, 1-86, 1-91, 1-92, 1-94, 1-100, 1-102, 1-104, 2-22, 3-5,
3-20, 3-44, 3-50, 3-57, and 3-69 of East Baton Rouge Parish.
(3) Election section three is composed of Precincts 1-8, 1-9, 1-12, 1-33, 1-34,
1-35, 1-39, 1-40, 1-41, 1-42, 1-43, 1-44, 1-47, 1-48, 1-49, 1-52, 1-53, 1-56, 1-57,
1-59, 1-64, 1-65, 1-66, 1-69, 1-72, 1-73, 1-74, 1-75, 1-79, 1-80, 1-89, 1-90, 1-98,
1-99, 1-103, 1-105, 1-106, 1-107, 2-6, 2-7, 2-8, 2-33, 3-1, 3-2, 3-3, 3-4, 3-6, 3-7, 3-9,
3-10, 3-11, 3-12, 3-13, 3-14, 3-15, 3-16, 3-17, 3-18, 3-19, 3-21, 3-22, 3-23, 3-25,
3-26, 3-27, 3-28, 3-29, 3-30, 3-31, 3-32, 3-33, 3-34, 3-35, 3-36, 3-37, 3-38, 3-39,
3-40, 3-41, 3-43, 3-45, 3-46, 3-47, 3-48, 3-49, 3-51, 3-52, 3-53, 3-55, 3-56, 3-58,
3-59, 3-60, 3-61, 3-62, 3-63, 3-64, 3-65, 3-66, 3-67, 3-68, 3-70, 3-71, 3-72, 3-73,
3-74, 3-75, and 3-76 of East Baton Rouge Parish.
* * *
§1403. Judges; qualification; election
There shall be four judges presiding over the family court, who shall possess
the same qualifications required of district judges. The judges shall be elected for
Page 2 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-224 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 442
the same term and at the time fixed by law for the election of district judges
throughout the state. One judge, Division B, shall be elected from election section
one,; one judge, Division C, shall be elected from election section two,; and two
judges, Divisions A and D, shall be elected from election section three.
Section 2.(A) Each judge of the family court for the parish of East Baton Rouge in
office on the effective date of this Act shall be judge for the election section having the same
designation as the election section from which he was elected and may complete the term
for which he was elected.
(B) The successor to the office of a judge of the family court for the parish of East
Baton Rouge shall be elected from the election section assigned to that office as provided
by R.S. 13:1403. The election shall be from the election section composed as provided by
R.S. 13:1401.1.
Section 3.(A) The precincts referenced in this Act are those contained in the file
named "2026 Precinct Shapefiles (01-27-2026)" available on the website of the Legislature
of Louisiana on the effective date of this Section. The 2026 Precinct Shapefiles are based
upon those Voting Districts (VTDs) contained in the 2020 Census Redistricting TIGER/Line
Shapefiles for the State of Louisiana as those filed have been modified and validated through
the data verification program of the Louisiana House of Representatives and the Louisiana
Senate to represent precinct changes submitted through January 27, 2026, to the Legislature
of Louisiana by parish governing authorities pursuant to the provisions of R.S. 18:532 and
532.1.
(B) When a precinct referenced in this Act has been subdivided by action of the
parish governing authority on a nongeographic basis or subdivided by action of the parish
governing authority on a geographic basis in accordance with the provisions of R.S.
18:532.1, the enumeration in this Act of the general precinct designation shall include all
nongeographic and all geographic subdivisions thereof, however such subdivisions may be
designated.
Page 3 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-224 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 442
(C) The territorial limits of the districts as provided in this Act shall continue in
effect until changed by law regardless of any subsequent change made to the precincts by
the parish governing authority.
Section 4. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.